Washington statutes.
RCW 8.26.075

Assurance of availability of housing—Exceptions.

(1) If a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency cannot proceed on a timely basis because comparable replacement dwellings are not available, and the head of the displacing agency determines that the dwellings cannot otherwise be made available, the head of the displacing agency may take such action as is necessary or appropriate to provide the dwellings by use of funds authorized for the project. The displacing agency may use this section to exceed the maximum amounts that may be paid under RCW 8.26.045 and 8.26.055 on a case-by-case basis for good cause as determined in accordance with rules adopted by the lead agency.

(2) No person may be required to move from a dwelling on account of any program or project undertaken by a displacing agency unless the displacing agency is satisfied that comparable replacement housing is available to the person.

(3) The displacing agency shall assure that a person shall not be required to move from a dwelling unless the person has had a reasonable opportunity to relocate to a comparable replacement dwelling, except in the case of the following:

(a) A major disaster as defined in section 102(2) of the Federal Disaster Relief Act of 1974;

(b) A national emergency declared by the president; or

(c) Any other emergency that requires the person to move immediately from the dwelling because continued occupancy of the dwelling by the person constitutes a substantial danger to the health or safety of the person.

[ 1988 c 90 s 7.]

NOTES:

Section captions—1988 c 90: See note following RCW 8.26.010.